Indiana, session 2026, HB1175.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Indiana:
SECTION 1. IC 4-13-1-30 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE
AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
UPON PASSAGE]: Sec. 30. (a) As used in this section,
"commission" refers to the Indiana protection and advocacy
services commission established by IC 12-28-1-6.
(b) The department and the commission shall jointly study the
accessibility of the state house to individuals with disabilities. The
study must identify barriers to, or other limitations on, the
accessibility of the state house to individuals with disabilities.
(c) Before November 1, 2026, the department and the
commission shall jointly submit to the:
(1) budget committee;
(2) governor; and
(3) legislative council;
a report on the study required by subsection (b). The report must
contain findings and recommendations on improving access to the
state house and the offices, rooms, and public spaces within the
2026 IN 1175—LS 6657/DI 92


state house to individuals with disabilities.
(d) The report required by subsection (b) must be submitted to
the legislative council in an electronic format under IC 5-14-6.
(e) This section expires June 30, 2027.
SECTION 2. An emergency is declared for this act.
2026 IN 1175—LS 6657/DI 92